Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.012

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Committee" means the joint committee on energy supply, energy conservation, and energy resilience.

(2) "Conservation" means reduced energy consumption or energy cost, or increased efficiency in the use of energy, and activities, measures, or equipment designed to achieve such results.

[ 2023 c 230 s 309; 2005 c 299 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.

Intent—2005 c 299: See note following RCW 44.39.010.